Louisiana, session 2026, HB761.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1076.1 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1076.1. Advisory board; composition; recommendations for treatment of rare
cancers; meetings; rulemaking
A. There is hereby created within the department an advisory board that shall
review and provide medical recommendations to approve new treatments for rare
cancers. The advisory board shall be composed of the following seventeen
members:
(1) The commissioner or his designee.
(2) The secretary or designee of the Louisiana Department of Health.
(3) The Medicaid Director or designee of the Louisiana Department of
Health.
(4) The surgeon general or his designee.
(5) The executive director or designee of Taking Aim at Cancer in Louisiana
the Cancer Association of Louisiana.
(6) The chief executive officer of the Louisiana Association of Health Plans.
(7) The chief medical officer or designee of a managed care organization.
(8) The director or designee of the Louisiana Tumor Registry.
(9) The director or designee of the Pennington Biomedical Research Center.
(10) A designee of the Louisiana Cancer Research Center.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 761 ENROLLED
(11) A designee of the LSU Health Sciences Center at New Orleans,
specializing in oncology.
(12) A designee of the Tulane Medical School, specializing in oncology.
(13) A designee of the Xavier Ochsner College of Medicine.
(14) Two Four oncologists specializing in the treatments of rare cancers.
B.(1) The chairperson of the advisory board shall be the executive director
or designee of the Louisiana Cancer Research Center.
(2) The advisory board shall hold quarterly public meetings unless otherwise
provided by vote of the advisory board or by order of the chairperson. Within thirty
No later than forty-five days of after each meeting, the advisory board shall compile
a report of its findings and submit a formal written report to the legislature House
Committee on Insurance and the Senate Committee on Insurance.
C. The commissioner may promulgate and adopt administrative rules and
regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act as are necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.